Oklahoma, session 2026, SB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-901d, as


amended by Section 93, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2023,


Section 11-901d), is amended to read as follows:


Section 11-901d. A. It While a motor vehicle is in motion, it


shall be unlawful for any person to operate a motor vehicle on any


street or highway within this state while using:


1. Using a hand-held electronic communication device or


cellular telephone to manually compose, send, or read an electronic


text message while the motor vehicle is in motion; or

Req. No. 668 Page 1


2. Holding or using a hand-held cellular telephone.


B. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection A of


this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not


more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) Five Dollars ($5.00) and


court costs and fees not more than Ninety-five Dollars ($95.00).


The court clerk shall collect the fine, costs, and fees and direct


distribution as follows:


1. The sum of Thirty-three Dollars and seventy-two cents


($33.72) for each offense for which the defendant is convicted,


regardless of whether the sentence is deferred, shall cover


docketing of the case, filing of all papers, issuance of process,


warrants, order, and other services to the date of judgment;


2. The sum of Eight Dollars and eighty cents ($8.80) shall be


assessed and credited to the District Attorneys Council Revolving


Fund, created pursuant to Section 215.28 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, to defray the cost of prosecution;


3. The sum of Eleven Dollars ($11.00) shall be assessed and


credited to the Oklahoma Court Information System Revolving Fund,


created pursuant to Section 1315 of Title 20 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


4. The sum of Four Dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) shall be


assessed and credited to the Sheriff’s Service Fee Account of the


county in which the conviction occurred for the purpose of enhancing


existing or providing additional courthouse security;

Req. No. 668 Page 2


5. The sum of One Dollar and thirty cents ($1.30) shall be


assessed and credited to the Office of the Attorney General Victim


Services Unit;


6. The sum of One Dollar and thirty cents ($1.30) shall be


assessed and credited to the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Account,


created pursuant to Section 1-9-103 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


7. The sum of Two Dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) shall


be assessed and credited to the Sheriff’s Service Fee Account of the


sheriff of the county in which the arrest was made;


8. The sum of Four Dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) shall be


assessed and credited to the CLEET Fund, created pursuant to Section


1313.2 of Title 20 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


9. The sum of Four Dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) shall be


assessed. Four Dollars and ten cents ($4.10) of each fine, cost,


and fee received pursuant to this paragraph shall be credited to the


A.F.I.S. Fund, created pursuant to Section 150.25 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, and the remaining balance shall be deposited in


the General Revenue Fund by the court clerk. The payments shall be


made to the appropriate fund by the court clerk on a monthly basis


as set forth by subsection I of Section 1313.2 of Title 20 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


10. The sum of Four Dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) shall be


assessed. Four Dollars and twenty-eight cents ($4.28) of each fee

Req. No. 668 Page 3


received pursuant to this paragraph shall be collected and sent to


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation for deposit into the


Forensic Science Improvement Revolving Fund, created pursuant to


Section 150.35 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The remaining


balance shall be retained by the court clerk;


11. The sum of Nine Dollars ($9.00) shall be assessed and


forwarded monthly in one check or draft to the Department of Public


Safety to be deposited in the Department of Public Safety Patrol


Vehicle Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 2-143 of this


title;


12. Pursuant to subsection C of Section 220 of Title 19 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, the court clerk shall assess an administrative


fee of ten percent (10%) on fines, costs, and fees assessed in


paragraphs 2, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, and 11 of this subsection which


shall be deposited in the Court Clerk’s Revolving Fund; and


13. Pursuant to subsection D of Section 220 of Title 19 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, the court clerk shall assess an administrative


fee of fifteen percent (15%) on fines, costs, and fees assessed in


paragraphs 2, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, and 11 of this subsection which


shall be deposited in the District Court Revolving Fund.


C. The Department of Public Safety shall not record or assess


points for violations of this section on any license holder’s


traffic record maintained by Service Oklahoma.



Req. No. 668 Page 4


D. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not


apply if the person is using the a cellular telephone or electronic


communication device for:


1. In conjunction with hands-free or voice-operated technology;


or


2. For the sole purpose of communicating with any of the


following regarding an imminent emergency situation:


1. An


a. an emergency response operator;,


2. A


b. a hospital, physician’s office, or health clinic;,


3. A


c. a provider of ambulance services;,


4. A


d. a provider of firefighting services;, or


5. A


e. a law enforcement agency.


E. Municipalities may enact and municipal police officers may


enforce ordinances prohibiting and penalizing conduct under the


provisions of this section. The provisions of such ordinances shall


be the same as provided for in this section; the enforcement


provisions of those ordinances shall not be more stringent than


those of this section; and the fine and court costs for municipal



Req. No. 668 Page 5


ordinance violations shall be the same or a lesser amount as


provided for in this section.


F. For the purpose of this section:


1. “Cellular telephone” means an analog or digital wireless


telephone authorized by the Federal Communications Commission to


operate in the frequency bandwidth reserved for cellular telephones;


2. “Compose”, “send”, or “read” with respect to a text message


means the manual entry, sending, or retrieval of a text message to


communicate with any person or device;


3. “Electronic communication device” means an electronic device


that permits the user to manually transmit a communication of


written text by means other than through an oral transfer or wire


communication. This term does not include:


a. a device that is physically or electronically


integrated into a motor vehicle,


b. a voice-operated global positioning or navigation


system that is affixed to a motor vehicle,


c. a hands-free or voice-operated device that allows the


user to write, send, or read a text message without


the use of either hand except to activate, deactivate,


or initiate a feature or function, or


d. an ignition interlock device that has been installed


on a motor vehicle, or


e. amateur radio use or operation; and

Req. No. 668 Page 6


4. “Text message” includes a text-based message, instant


message, electronic message, photo, video, or electronic mail.


G. A law enforcement officer shall not, without the consent of


the person:


1. Confiscate a cellular telephone or electronic communication


device for the purpose of determining compliance with this section;


2. Confiscate a cellular telephone or electronic communication


device and retain it as evidence pending trial for a violation of


this section; or


3. Extract or otherwise download information from a cellular


telephone or electronic communication device for a violation of this


section unless:


a. the law enforcement officer has probable cause to


believe that the cellular telephone or electronic


communication device has been used in the commission


of a crime,


b. the information is extracted or otherwise downloaded


under a valid search warrant, or


c. otherwise authorized by law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-1-668 CN 1/19/2025 5:38:56 AM





Req. No. 668 Page 7